Utah statutes.
53-1-104.   Boards, bureaus, councils, divisions, and offices.

(1)  The following are the policymaking boards within the department:

(a)  the Driver License Medical Advisory Board, created in Section 53-3-303;

(b)  the Concealed Firearm Review Board, created in Section 53-5-703;

(c)  the Utah Fire Prevention Board, created in Section 53-7-203;

(d)  the Liquified Petroleum Gas Board, created in Section 53-7-304; and

(e)  the Private Investigator Hearing and Licensure Board, created in Section 53-9-104.

(2)  The following are the councils within the department:

(a)  the Peace Officer Standards and Training Council, created in Section 53-6-106; and

(b)  the Motor Vehicle Safety Inspection Advisory Council, created in Section 53-8-203.

(3)  The following are the divisions within the department:

(a)  the Administrative Services Division, created in Section 53-1-203;

(b)  the Management Information Services Division, created in Section 53-1-303;

(c)  the Division of Emergency Management, created in Section 53-2-103;

(d)  the Driver License Division, created in Section 53-3-103;

(e)  the Criminal Investigations and Technical Services Division, created in Section 53-10-103;

(f)  the Peace Officers Standards and Training Division, created in Section 53-6-103;

(g)  the State Fire Marshal Division, created in Section 53-7-103; and

(h)  the Utah Highway Patrol Division, created in Section 53-8-103.

(4)  The Office of Executive Protection is created in Section 53-1-112.

(5)  The following are bureaus within the department:

(a)  Bureau of Criminal Identification, created in Section 53-10-201;

(b)  State Bureau of Investigation, created in Section 53-10-301;

(c)  Bureau of Forensic Services, created in Section 53-10-401; and

(d)  Bureau of Communications, created in Section 53-10-501.



Amended by Chapter 55, 2011 General Session

